District of Columbia statutes.
8-151.05

Delegation of authority.

The Director of DDOE is the successor to all environment related authority attached to transferred functions and is authorized to act, either personally or through a designee, as a member of any committee, commission, board, or other body which his or her predecessor was a member.

History

Feb. 15, 2006, D.C. Law 16-51, § 105, 52 DCR 10812